Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 3 Certificate of Need Program
31-6-42.
Qualifications for issuance of certificate.

The written findings of fact and decision, with respect to the department’s grant or denial of a certificate of need, shall be based on the applicable considerations specified in this Code section and reasonable rules promulgated by the department interpretive thereof. The department shall issue a certificate of need to each applicant whose application is consistent with the following considerations and such rules deemed applicable to a project, except as specified in subsection (f) of Code Section 31-6-43:

The proposed new institutional health services are reasonably consistent with the relevant general goals and objectives of the state health plan;

The population residing in the area served, or to be served, by the new institutional health service has a need for such services;

Existing alternatives for providing services in the service area the same as the new institutional health service proposed are neither currently available, implemented, similarly utilized, nor capable of providing a less costly alternative, or no certificate of need to provide such alternative services has been issued by the department and is currently valid;

The project can be adequately financed and is, in the immediate and long term, financially feasible;

The effects of new institutional health service on payors for health services, including governmental payors, are not unreasonable;

The costs and methods of a proposed construction project, including the costs and methods of energy provision and conservation, are reasonable and adequate for quality health care;

The new institutional health service proposed is reasonably financially and physically accessible to the residents of the proposed service area;

The proposed new institutional health service has a positive relationship to the existing health care delivery system in the service area;

The proposed new institutional health service encourages more efficient utilization of the health care facility proposing such service;

The proposed new institutional health service provides, or would provide, a substantial portion of its services to individuals not residing in its defined service area or the adjacent service area;

The proposed new institutional health service conducts biomedical or behavioral research projects or new service development which is designed to meet a national, regional, or state-wide need;

The proposed new institutional health service meets the clinical needs of health professional training programs which request assistance;

The proposed new institutional health service fosters improvements or innovations in the financing or delivery of health services, promotes health care quality assurance or cost effectiveness, or fosters competition that is shown to result in lower patient costs without a loss of the quality of care;

The proposed new institutional health service fosters the special needs and circumstances of health maintenance organizations;

The proposed new institutional health service meets the department’s minimum quality standards, including, but not limited to, standards relating to accreditation, minimum volumes, quality improvements, assurance practices, and utilization review procedures;

The proposed new institutional health service can obtain the necessary resources, including health care personnel and management personnel; and

The proposed new institutional health service is an underrepresented health service, as determined annually by the department. The department shall, by rule, provide for an advantage to equally qualified applicants that agree to provide an underrepresented service in addition to the services for which the application was originally submitted.

In the case of applications for the development or offering of a new institutional health service or health care facility for osteopathic medicine, the need for such service or facility shall be determined on the basis of the need and availability in the community for osteopathic services and facilities in addition to the considerations in subsection (a) of this Code section. Nothing in this chapter shall, however, be construed as otherwise recognizing any distinction between allopathic and osteopathic medicine.

(b.1)

In the case of applications for the construction, development, or establishment of a destination cancer hospital, the applicable considerations as to the need for such service shall not include paragraphs (1), (2), (3), (7), (8), (10), (11), and (14) of subsection (a) of this Code section but shall include:

(b.2)

In the case of applications for basic perinatal services in counties where:

Paragraphs (4), (5), (6), (9), (12), (13), (15), (16), and (17) of subsection (a) of this Code section;

That the proposed new destination cancer hospital can demonstrate, based on historical data from the applicant or its affiliated entities, that its annual patient base shall be composed of a minimum of 65 percent of patients who reside outside of the State of Georgia;

That the proposed new destination cancer hospital states its intent to provide uncompensated indigent or charity care which shall meet or exceed 3 percent of its adjusted gross revenues and provide care to Medicaid beneficiaries;

That the proposed new destination cancer hospital shall conduct biomedical or behavioral research projects or service development which is designed to meet a national or regional need;

That the proposed new destination cancer hospital shall be reasonably financially and physically accessible;

That the proposed new destination cancer hospital shall have a positive relationship to the existing health care delivery system on a regional basis;

(6.1)

That the proposed new destination cancer hospital shall enter into a hospital transfer agreement with one or more hospitals within a reasonable distance from the destination cancer hospital or the medical staff at the destination cancer hospital has admitting privileges or other acceptable documented arrangements with such hospital or hospitals to ensure the necessary backup for the destination cancer hospital for medical complications. The destination cancer hospital shall have the capability to transfer a patient immediately to a hospital within a reasonable distance from the destination cancer hospital with adequate emergency room services. Hospitals shall not unreasonably deny a transfer agreement with the destination cancer hospital. In the event that a destination cancer hospital and another hospital cannot agree to the terms of a transfer agreement as required by this paragraph, the department shall mediate between such parties for a period of no more than 45 days. If an agreement is still not reached within such 45 day period, the parties shall enter into binding arbitration conducted by the department;

That an applicant for a new destination cancer hospital shall document in its application that the new facility is not predicted to be detrimental to existing hospitals within the planning area. Such demonstration shall be made by providing an analysis in such application that compares current and projected changes in market share and payor mix for such applicant and such existing hospitals within the planning area. Impact on an existing hospital shall be determined to be adverse if, based on the utilization projected by the applicant, such existing hospital would have a total decrease of 10 percent or more in its average annual utilization, as measured by patient days for the two most recent and available preceding calendar years of data; and

That the destination cancer hospital shall express its intent to participate in medical staffing work force development activities.

the department shall not apply the consideration contained in paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section.

If the denial of an application for a certificate of need for a new institutional health service proposed to be offered or developed by a:

Minority administered hospital facility serving a socially and economically disadvantaged minority population in an urban setting; or

Minority administered hospital facility utilized for the training of minority medical practitioners

would adversely impact upon the facility and population served by said facility, the special needs of such hospital facility and the population served by said facility for the new institutional health service shall be given extraordinary consideration by the department in making its determination of need as required by this Code section. The department shall have the authority to vary or modify strict adherence to the provisions of this chapter and the rules enacted pursuant hereto in considering the special needs of such facility and its population served and to avoid an adverse impact on the facility and the population served thereby. For purposes of this subsection, the term “minority administered hospital facility” means a hospital controlled or operated by a governing body or administrative staff composed predominantly of members of a minority race.

For the purposes of the considerations contained in this Code section and in the department’s applicable rules, relevant data which were unavailable or omitted when the state health plan or rules were prepared or revised may be considered in the evaluation of a project.

The department shall specify in its written findings of fact and decision which of the considerations contained in this Code section and the department’s applicable rules are applicable to an application and its reasoning as to and evidentiary support for its evaluation of each such applicable consideration and rule.

(1)

Only one civilian health care facility or health system is currently providing basic perinatal services; and

(2)

There are not at least three different health care facilities in a contiguous county providing basic perinatal services,

History.

Code 1981, §

31-6-42

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1566, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 31; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 22; Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 1-1/SB 433.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 3-1/SB 433, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall only apply to applications submitted on or after July 1, 2008.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on administrative law, see 64 Mercer L. Rev. 39 (2012).

For article with annual survey on administrative law, see 73 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2021).

31-6-42.1.
Payment of obligations prior to granting or modifying a certificate of need.

No applicant for a new certificate of need, a modification to an existing certificate of need, or a conversion of a certificate of need that has any outstanding amounts owed to the state including fines, penalties, fees, or other payments for noncompliance with any requirements contained in Code Section 31-6-40.1, 31-6-45.2, 31-6-70, 31-7-280, or 31-8-179.2 shall be eligible to receive a new certificate of need or a modification to an existing certificate of need unless such applicant pays such outstanding amounts to the state. Any such fines, penalties, fees, or other payments for noncompliance shall be subject to the same notices and hearing for the levy of fines under Code Section 31-6-45.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-6-42.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 148, § 1-7/HB 186.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2019.

31-6-43.
Acceptance or rejection of application for certificate.

At least 30 days prior to submitting an application for a certificate of need for clinical health services, a person shall submit a letter of intent to the department. The department shall provide by rule a process for submitting letters of intent and a mechanism by which applications may be filed to compete with and be reviewed comparatively with proposals described in submitted letters of intent.

Each application for a certificate of need shall be reviewed by the department and within ten working days after the date of its receipt a determination shall be made as to whether the application complies with the rules governing the preparation and submission of applications. If the application complies with the rules governing the preparation and submission of applications, the department shall declare the application complete for review, shall accept and date the application, and shall notify the applicant of the timetable for its review. The department shall also notify a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the project shall be developed that the application has been deemed complete. The department shall also notify the appropriate regional commission and the chief elected official of the county and municipal governments, if any, in whose boundaries the proposed project will be located that the application is complete for review. If the application does not comply with the rules governing the preparation and submission of applications, the department shall notify the applicant in writing and provide a list of all deficiencies. The applicant shall be afforded an opportunity to correct such deficiencies, and upon such correction, the application shall then be declared complete for review within ten days of the correction of such deficiencies, and notice given to a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the project shall be developed that the application has been so declared. The department shall also notify the appropriate regional commission and the chief elected official of the county and municipal governments, if any, in whose boundaries the proposed project will be located that the application is complete for review or when in the determination of the department a significant amendment is filed.

The department shall specify by rule the time within which an applicant may amend its application. The department may request an applicant to make amendments. The department decision shall be made on an application as amended, if at all, by the applicant.

There shall be a time limit of 120 days for review of a project, beginning on the day the department declares the application complete for review or in the case of applications joined for comparative review, beginning on the day the department declares the final application complete. The department may adopt rules for determining when it is not practicable to complete a review in 120 days and may extend the review period upon written notice to the applicant but only for an extended period of not longer than an additional 30 days. The department shall adopt rules governing the submission of additional information by the applicant and for opposing an application.

No party may oppose an application for a certificate of need for a proposed project unless:

Such party offers substantially similar services as proposed within a 35 mile radius of the proposed project or has a service area that overlaps the applicant’s proposed service area; or

Such party has submitted a competing application in the same batching cycle and is proposing to establish the same type of facility proposed or offers substantially similar services as proposed and has a service area that overlaps the applicant’s proposed service area.

To allow the opportunity for comparative review of applications, the department may provide by rule for applications for a certificate of need to be submitted on a timetable or batching cycle basis no less often than two times per calendar year for each clinical health service. Applications for services, facilities, or expenditures for which there is no specified batching cycle may be filed at any time.

The department may order the joinder of an application which is determined to be complete by the department for comparative review with one or more subsequently filed applications declared complete for review during the same batching cycle when:

The first and subsequent applications involve similar clinical health service projects in the same service area or overlapping service areas; and

The subsequent applications are filed and are declared complete for review within 30 days of the date the first application was declared complete for review.

Following joinder of the first application with subsequent applications, none of the subsequent applications so joined may be considered as a first application for the purposes of future joinder. The department shall notify the applicant to whose application a joinder is ordered and all other applicants previously joined to such application of the fact of each joinder pursuant to this subsection. In the event one or more applications have been joined pursuant to this subsection, the time limits for department action for all of the applicants shall run from the latest date that any one of the joined applications was declared complete for review. In the event of the consideration of one or more applications joined pursuant to this subsection, the department may award no certificate of need or one or more certificates of need to the application or applications, if any, which are consistent with the considerations contained in Code Section 31-6-42, the department’s applicable rules, and the award of which will best satisfy the purposes of this chapter.

The department shall review the application and all written information submitted by the applicant in support of the application and all information submitted in opposition to the application to determine the extent to which the proposed project is consistent with the applicable considerations stated in Code Section 31-6-42 and in the department’s applicable rules. During the course of the review, the department staff may request additional information from the applicant as deemed appropriate. Pursuant to rules adopted by the department, a public hearing on applications covered by those regulations may be held prior to the date of the department’s decision thereon. Such rules shall provide that when good cause has been shown, a public hearing shall be held by the department. Any interested person may submit information to the department concerning an application, and an applicant shall be entitled to notice of and to respond to any such submission.

The department shall provide the applicant an opportunity to meet with the department to discuss the application and to provide an opportunity to submit additional information. Such additional information shall be submitted within the time limits adopted by the department. The department shall also provide an opportunity for any party that is permitted to oppose an application pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of this Code section to meet with the department and to provide additional information to the department. In order for any such opposing party to have standing to appeal an adverse decision pursuant to Code Section 31-6-44, such party must attend and participate in an opposition meeting.

Unless extended by the department for an additional period of up to 30 days pursuant to subsection (d) of this Code section, the department shall, no later than 120 days after an application is determined to be complete for review, or, in the event of joined applications, 120 days after the last application is declared complete for review, provide written notification to an applicant of the department’s decision to issue or to deny issuance of a certificate of need for the proposed project. Such notice shall contain the department’s written findings of fact and decision as to each applicable consideration or rule and a detailed statement of the reasons and evidentiary support for issuing or denying a certificate of need for the action proposed by each applicant. The department shall also mail such notification to the appropriate regional commission and the chief elected official of the county and municipal governments, if any, in whose boundaries the proposed project will be located. In the event such decision is to issue a certificate of need, the certificate of need shall be effective on the day of the decision unless the decision is appealed to the Certificate of Need Appeal Panel in accordance with this chapter. Within seven days of the decision, the department shall publish notice of its decision to grant or deny an application in the same manner as it publishes notice of the filing of an application.

Should the department fail to provide written notification of the decision within the time limitations set forth in this Code section, an application shall be deemed to have been approved as of the one hundred twenty-first day following notice from the department that an application, or the last of any applications joined pursuant to subsection (f) of this Code section, is declared “complete for review.”

Notwithstanding other provisions of this article, when the Governor has declared a state of emergency in a region of the state, existing health care facilities in the affected region may seek emergency approval from the department to make expenditures in excess of the capital expenditure threshold or to offer services that may otherwise require a certificate of need. The department shall give special expedited consideration to such requests and may authorize such requests for good cause. Once the state of emergency has been lifted, any services offered by an affected health care facility under this subsection shall cease to be offered until such time as the health care facility that received the emergency authorization has requested and received a certificate of need. For purposes of this subsection, “good cause” means that authorization of the request shall directly resolve a situation posing an immediate threat to the health and safety of the public. The department shall establish, by rule, procedures whereby requirements for the process of review and issuance of a certificate of need may be modified and expedited as a result of emergency situations.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-6-43

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1566, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 31; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1317, §§ 6.15, 6.16; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 22; Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 1-1/SB 433; Ga. L. 2008, p. 181, § 15/HB 1216; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 31/HB 942; Ga. L. 2019, p. 148, § 1-8/HB 186.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, designated the existing provisions of subsection (d) as paragraph (d)(1); added paragraph (d)(2); and, in subsection (h), substituted “permitted to oppose an application pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of this Code section” for “opposed to an application” in the third sentence and substituted “any such” for “an” near the beginning of the fourth sentence.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2008, subsection (g), as enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 1-1, was redesignated as subsection (k).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 3-1/SB 433, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall only apply to applications submitted on or after July 1, 2008.